Indiana, session 2026, HB1382.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-3.5-12 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 12. County Option Gasoline Tax
Sec. 1. This chapter applies to all counties.
Sec. 2. This chapter does not apply to the sale of special fuel.
Sec. 3. The definitions in IC 36-1-2 and the following definitions
apply throughout this chapter:
(1) "Federal gasoline tax" means the excise tax imposed on
gasoline under Section 4081 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(2) "Gasoline" has the meaning set forth in IC 6-6-1.1-103(g).
(3) "Gasoline use tax" means the tax imposed under
IC 6-2.5-3.5.
(4) "Gross retail income" has the meaning set forth in
IC 6-2.5-1-5.
(5) "Indiana gasoline tax" means the tax imposed under
IC 6-6-1.1.
2026 IN 1382—LS 6892/DI 125


(6) "Metered pump" has the meaning set forth in
IC 6-2.5-3.5-6.
(7) "Person" has the meaning set forth in IC 6-2.5-1-3.
(8) "Retail merchant" has the meaning set forth in
IC 6-2.5-1-8.
(9) "Special fuel" has the meaning set forth in IC 6-6-2.5-22.
Sec. 4. (a) Subject to subsections (d) and (e), the county fiscal
body may adopt an ordinance to impose an excise tax, known as the
county option gasoline tax, on transactions described in section 6
of this chapter. Subject to section 7 of this chapter, the ordinance
must specify the rate of the county option gasoline tax to be
imposed in the county. The county fiscal body may adopt an
ordinance under this subsection only after the county fiscal body
has held at least one (1) separate public hearing in which a
discussion of the proposed ordinance to impose the county option
gasoline tax is the only substantive issue on the agenda for the
public hearing.
(b) If the county fiscal body adopts an ordinance under
subsection (a), the county fiscal body shall immediately send a
certified copy of the ordinance to the department of state revenue.
(c) If the county fiscal body adopts an ordinance under
subsection (a), the county option gasoline tax applies to
transactions that occur after the later of the following:
(1) The day specified in the ordinance.
(2) The last day of the month that succeeds the month in
which the ordinance is adopted.
(d) A county fiscal body that has adopted an ordinance to
impose taxes under IC 6-3.5-4 and IC 6-3.5-5 may not concurrently
adopt an ordinance to impose the tax under this chapter. If a
county fiscal body that has adopted an ordinance to impose the
taxes under IC 6-3.5-4 and IC 6-3.5-5 wishes to instead adopt an
ordinance to impose the county option gasoline tax under this
chapter, the county fiscal body must first adopt an ordinance to
rescind the taxes under IC 6-3.5-4 and IC 6-3.5-5 in the manner
provided in IC 6-3.5-4 and IC 6-3.5-5, respectively. If a county
fiscal body that has adopted an ordinance to impose taxes under
IC 6-3.5-4 and IC 6-3.5-5 concurrently adopts an ordinance to
impose the tax under this chapter, the ordinance adopted under
this chapter is not effective unless the ordinances adopted under
IC 6-3.5-4 and IC 6-3.5-5 and corresponding taxes are rescinded.
(e) If the:
(1) fiscal body of a municipality in a county has adopted an
2026 IN 1382—LS 6892/DI 125


ordinance to impose the taxes under IC 6-3.5-10 and
IC 6-3.5-11; and
(2) county fiscal body wishes to concurrently adopt an
ordinance to impose the county option gasoline tax under this
chapter and is not otherwise prohibited from adopting the
ordinance under subsection (d);
the county fiscal body may adopt an ordinance to impose the
county option gasoline tax under this chapter. However, the county
option gasoline tax may not be imposed, paid, or collected in the
territory located inside the corporate limits of the municipality, as
applicable, and may only be imposed, paid, and collected in the
territory in the county that is outside the territory located inside
the corporate limits of the municipality, as applicable. In addition,
the municipality, as applicable, may not adopt an ordinance or
resolution described in section 10 of this chapter, may not receive
any distribution of revenue from a tax imposed under this chapter,
and the lane mileage of the municipality, as applicable, may not be
included in calculating distribution amounts under section 11 of
this chapter. However, the limitations in this subsection are no
longer applicable if the fiscal body of the municipality subsequently
adopts an ordinance to rescind the imposition of the taxes under
IC 6-3.5-10 and IC 6-3.5-11.
Sec. 5. (a) Subject to this section and section 7 of this chapter,
the county fiscal body may adopt an ordinance to rescind,
decrease, or increase the county option gasoline tax rate at a public
hearing. However, the county fiscal body may take action under
this subsection only once every two (2) years.
(b) If a county has outstanding bonds, leases, obligations, or
other evidences of indebtedness that are payable from the county
option gasoline tax, the county option gasoline tax may not be
decreased below a rate that would produce one and twenty-five
hundredths (1.25) times the total of the highest annual payment
requirements due on the bonds, leases, obligations, or other
evidences of indebtedness to their final maturity.
(c) For purposes of subsection (b), the determination of a tax
rate sufficient to produce one and twenty-five hundredths (1.25)
times the total of the highest annual payment requirements shall be
based on an average of the collections of the county option gasoline
tax for the immediately preceding three (3) years, if the tax has
been imposed for the preceding three (3) years. If the county option
gasoline tax has not been imposed for the preceding three (3) years,
the county option gasoline tax may not be reduced below a rate
2026 IN 1382—LS 6892/DI 125


that would produce one and twenty-five hundredths (1.25) times
the total of the highest annual payment requirements due on the
bonds, leases, obligations, or other evidences of indebtedness, based
on a study by a qualified public accountant or financial adviser.
Sec. 6. (a) A tax imposed under section 4 of this chapter applies
to a transaction in which gasoline is sold:
(1) for purchase at a location from a metered pump;
(2) in the county; and
(3) by a retail merchant for consideration.
(b) The county option gasoline tax does not apply to the
purchase of gasoline to the extent the sale is exempt from the state
gross retail tax imposed under IC 6-2.5.
Sec. 7. The county option gasoline tax rate:
(1) must be imposed in an increment of twenty-five
hundredths of one percent (0.25%); and
(2) may not exceed two percent (2%);
of the gross retail income received by the retail merchant from the
transaction described in section 6 of this chapter. However, for
purposes of this chapter, the gross retail income received by the
retail merchant from a transaction is the price per unit at which
gasoline is actually sold, including the gasoline use tax, Indiana
gasoline tax, and federal gasoline tax that are part of the sales
price.
Sec. 8. (a) A tax imposed under this chapter is imposed, paid,
and collected in the same manner that the state gross retail tax is
imposed, paid, and collected under IC 6-2.5. A retail merchant that
sells gasoline shall remit the county option gasoline tax to the
department of state revenue for each gallon of gasoline sold. The
retail merchant shall remit that amount regardless of the amount
of county option gasoline tax that the retail merchant has actually
collected under this chapter. However, a retail merchant is entitled
to deduct and retain the amounts prescribed in IC 6-2.5-6-10.
(b) The return to be filed with the payment of the tax imposed
under this chapter may be made on a separate return or may be
combined with the return filed for the payment of the state gross
retail tax, as prescribed by the department of state revenue.
Sec. 9. A retail merchant that has a duty to remit county option
gasoline taxes to the department of state revenue or a political
subdivision holds those county option gasoline taxes in trust for the
state or political subdivision and is liable for the payment of the
county option gasoline taxes, plus any penalties and interest
attributable to the county option gasoline taxes, to the state or
2026 IN 1382—LS 6892/DI 125


political subdivision. A retail merchant that fails to remit the tax
or file the returns or reports required by this chapter is subject to
the penalties set forth in IC 6-8.1-10.
Sec. 10. Except as provided in section 4(e) of this chapter, a
municipality that is located in a county that imposes the county
option gasoline tax and wishes to receive a portion of the revenue
received from the county option gasoline tax shall adopt an
ordinance or resolution at a public hearing that expresses:
(1) the municipality's support of the imposition of the county
option gasoline tax; and
(2) the municipality's desire to receive a portion of the
revenue from the tax.
Sec. 11. (a) The amounts received from the tax imposed under
this chapter shall be paid monthly by the treasurer of state to the
county fiscal officer upon warrants issued by the state comptroller.
(b) If a county imposes the county option gasoline tax under this
chapter, the county fiscal officer shall establish a county option
gasoline tax fund into which all amounts received monthly from the
treasurer of state shall be deposited.
(c) If a municipality has adopted an ordinance or resolution
described in section 10 of this chapter, before the twentieth day of
each month, the county auditor shall allocate the money deposited
in the county option gasoline tax fund during the previous month
among the county and the eligible municipalities in the county on
the basis of the county's and each municipality's lane mileage as a
percentage of the total lane mileage in the county and all
municipalities eligible to receive a distribution.
(d) Before the twenty-fifth day of each month, the county fiscal
officer shall distribute to the county and the eligible cities and
towns in the county the money deposited in the county option
gasoline tax fund during the previous month. The county fiscal
officer shall base the distribution on the allocations made by the
county auditor for the previous month under subsection (c).
(e) The fiscal officer of each municipality in the county set to
receive a distribution under this section shall establish a local
municipality gasoline tax receipts fund. The fiscal officer of each
municipality shall deposit in the fund all amounts received under
this section.
(f) The department of transportation shall provide to the county
auditor the total lane mileage for purposes of determining the
allocations under subsection (c).
Sec. 12. (a) In the case of a county that contains a consolidated
2026 IN 1382—LS 6892/DI 125


city, the city-county council may appropriate money derived from
the county option gasoline tax:
(1) to the department of transportation established by
IC 36-3-5-4 for use by the department under law;
(2) to an authority established under IC 36-7-23; or
(3) for the purposes allowed under IC 8-14-1-4(c).
(b) The city-county council may not appropriate money derived
from the county option gasoline tax for any other purpose.
Sec. 13. In the case of a county that does not contain a
consolidated city, money in the county option gasoline tax fund
must be used by the county only for the following purposes:
(1) To construct, reconstruct, repair, or maintain streets and
roads under the county's jurisdiction.
(2) As a contribution to an authority established under
IC 36-7-23.
(3) For the county's contribution to obtain a grant from the
local road and bridge matching grant fund under IC 8-23-30.
Sec. 14. In the case of a municipality that receives a distribution
of revenue from a tax imposed under this chapter, money in the
local municipality gasoline tax receipts fund may be used only for
the following purposes:
(1) To construct, reconstruct, repair, or maintain streets and
roads under the municipality's jurisdiction.
(2) As a contribution to an authority established under
IC 36-7-23.
(3) For the municipality's contribution to obtain a grant from
the local road and bridge matching grant fund under
IC 8-23-30.
Sec. 15. A county option gasoline tax imposed under this chapter
is a listed tax for purposes of IC 6-8.1-1.
SECTION 2. IC 6-8.1-1-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2023,
SECTION 19, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. "Listed taxes" or "taxes" includes only the
pari-mutuel taxes (IC 4-31-9-3 through IC 4-31-9-5); the supplemental
wagering tax (IC 4-33-12); the riverboat wagering tax (IC 4-33-13); the
slot machine wagering tax (IC 4-35-8); the type II gambling game
excise tax (IC 4-36-9); the gross income tax (IC 6-2.1) (repealed); the
utility receipts and utility services use taxes (IC 6-2.3) (repealed); the
state gross retail and use taxes (IC 6-2.5); the adjusted gross income tax
(IC 6-3); the pass through entity tax (IC 6-3-2.1); the supplemental net
income tax (IC 6-3-8) (repealed); the county adjusted gross income tax
(IC 6-3.5-1.1) (repealed); the county option income tax (IC 6-3.5-6)
2026 IN 1382—LS 6892/DI 125


(repealed); the county economic development income tax (IC 6-3.5-7)
(repealed); the county option gasoline tax (IC 6-3.5-12); the local
income tax (IC 6-3.6); the auto rental excise tax (IC 6-6-9); the
financial institutions tax (IC 6-5.5); the gasoline tax (IC 6-6-1.1); the
special fuel tax (IC 6-6-2.5); the motor carrier fuel tax (IC 6-6-4.1); a
motor fuel tax collected under a reciprocal agreement under IC 6-8.1-3;
the vehicle excise tax (IC 6-6-5); the aviation fuel excise tax (IC
6-6-13); the commercial vehicle excise tax (IC 6-6-5.5); the excise tax
imposed on recreational vehicles and truck campers (IC 6-6-5.1); the
hazardous waste disposal tax (IC 6-6-6.6) (repealed); the heavy
equipment rental excise tax (IC 6-6-15); the vehicle sharing excise tax
(IC 6-6-16); the cigarette tax (IC 6-7-1); the closed system cartridge tax
(IC 6-7-2-7.5); the electronic cigarette tax (IC 6-7-4); the beer excise
tax (IC 7.1-4-2); the liquor excise tax (IC 7.1-4-3); the wine excise tax
(IC 7.1-4-4); the hard cider excise tax (IC 7.1-4-4.5); the petroleum
severance tax (IC 6-8-1); the various innkeeper's taxes (IC 6-9); the
various food and beverage taxes (IC 6-9); the county admissions tax
(IC 6-9-13 and IC 6-9-28); the oil inspection fee (IC 16-44-2); the
penalties assessed for oversize vehicles (IC 9-20-3 and IC 9-20-18); the
fees and penalties assessed for overweight vehicles (IC 9-20-4 and
IC 9-20-18); and any other tax or fee that the department is required to
collect or administer.
SECTION 3. IC 8-23-30-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.173-2025,
SECTION 28, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) The local road and bridge matching grant
fund is established to provide matching grants to local units for eligible
projects.
(b) The department shall administer the fund.
(c) The fund consists of the following:
(1) Appropriations by the general assembly.
(2) Interest deposited in the fund under subsection (d).
(3) Money deposited in or transferred to the fund from any other
source.
(d) The treasurer of state shall invest money in the fund not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
manner as other public money may be invested. Interest that accrues
from these investments shall be deposited in the fund.
(e) Money in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year does not revert
to the state general fund.
(f) Not later than June 1, 2025, the department shall report to the
state comptroller the amount of matching grants awarded by the
department from the fund in the state fiscal year beginning July 1,
2026 IN 1382—LS 6892/DI 125


2024, and ending June 30, 2025, that the department will not distribute
before July 1, 2025.
(g) The state comptroller shall determine the balance of the money
in the fund on June 15, 2025, and on June 15 of each year thereafter.
After determining the balance of money in the fund under this
subsection, the money in the fund must be allocated in accordance with
subsection (h), transferred in accordance with subsections (i) and (j),
and distributed in accordance with subsection (k).
(h) After determining the balance of the money in the fund under
subsection (g), the money in the fund must first be allocated as follows:
(1) On June 30, 2025, the department must allocate the total of
the amount determined under subsection (f) plus one hundred
million dollars ($100,000,000) of money in the fund to make
matching grants in the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025,
and ending June 30, 2026, to all local units. The department may
not award more than one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000)
of matching grants in the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025,
and ending June 30, 2026.
(2) On June 30, 2026, and June 30 of each year thereafter, the
department must allocate the first one hundred million dollars
($100,000,000) of money in the fund to make matching grants in
the next state fiscal year to all local units.
(i) After the department allocates the money in the fund under
subsection (h), the state comptroller shall make the following five (5)
transfers:
(1) On June 30, 2026, a transfer of:
(A) to the state general fund, the total amount of the state tax
credits certified for 2025 by the department of state revenue
under IC 6-3.1-38.1-8(c); and
(B) to the department, an amount equal to twenty million
dollars ($20,000,000) minus the amount under clause (A) for
deposit in the state highway road construction and
improvement fund established under IC 8-14-10 for the
department's use in financing a railroad crossing upgrade
project as described in IC 8-14.5-8.
(2) On June 30, 2027, a transfer of:
(A) to the state general fund, the total amount of the state tax
credits certified for 2026 by the department of state revenue
under IC 6-3.1-38.1-8(c); and
(B) to the department, an amount equal to twenty million
dollars ($20,000,000) minus the amount under clause (A) for
deposit in the state highway road construction and
2026 IN 1382—LS 6892/DI 125


improvement fund established under IC 8-14-10 for the
department's use in financing a railroad crossing upgrade
project as described in IC 8-14.5-8.
(3) On June 30, 2028, a transfer of:
(A) to the state general fund, the total amount of the state tax
credits certified for 2027 by the department of state revenue
under IC 6-3.1-38.1-8(c); and
(B) to the department, an amount equal to twenty million
dollars ($20,000,000) minus the amount under clause (A) for
deposit in the state highway road construction and
improvement fund established under IC 8-14-10 for the
department's use in financing a railroad crossing upgrade
project as described in IC 8-14.5-8.
(4) On June 30, 2029, a transfer of twenty million dollars
($20,000,000) to the department for deposit in the state highway
road construction and improvement fund established under
IC 8-14-10 for the department's use in financing a railroad
crossing upgrade project as described in IC 8-14.5-8.
(5) On June 30, 2030, a transfer of twenty million dollars
($20,000,000) to the department for deposit in the state highway
road construction and improvement fund established under
IC 8-14-10 for the department's use in financing a railroad
crossing upgrade project as described in IC 8-14.5-8.
(j) Beginning on June 30, 2027, and on June 30 of each year
thereafter, after the department allocates the money under subsection
(h) and the state comptroller makes a transfer under subsection (i),
when applicable, the state comptroller shall transfer fifty million
dollars ($50,000,000) of money in the fund to the consolidated city in
Marion County for the construction, reconstruction, and preservation
of the consolidated city's local streets (as defined in IC 8-14-2-1(9)).
The consolidated city in Marion County shall not use these revenues
for:
(1) reducing the capacity of existing roads and streets;
(2) greenways;
(3) bike lanes;
(4) bike trails; and
(5) sidewalks.
One hundred percent (100%) of the money distributed to the
consolidated city under this subsection shall be matched with an
appropriation by the consolidated city. The appropriation required
under this subsection must be new revenue and may not include
revenue allocated to public safety purposes under IC 6-3.6-6.
2026 IN 1382—LS 6892/DI 125


(k) Beginning on June 30, 2027, and on June 30 of each year
thereafter, after the state comptroller makes a transfer under subsection
(j), the state comptroller shall distribute the remainder of the money in
the fund, as follows:
(1) To be eligible to receive a distribution under this subsection,
a local unit must: have:
(A) have, in the case of a county:
(i) adopted either a wheel tax or a county option gasoline
tax under IC 6-3.5-12; and
(B) (ii) provided the local technical assistance program at
Purdue University with an updated transportation asset
management plan within the last twelve (12) months; and
(B) in the case of a municipality:
(i) have adopted a wheel tax; or
(ii) be located in a county that imposes a county option
gasoline tax under IC 6-3.5-12 and have adopted an
ordinance or resolution described in IC 6-3.5-12-10.
(2) The distribution to a local unit eligible to receive a distribution
under subdivision (1) must be proportional to the local unit's
share of the total lane mileage for all local units eligible to receive
a distribution under subdivision (1). The department shall provide
to the state comptroller the total lane mileage for purposes of
making the distribution under this subsection.
A local unit may use a distribution made under this subsection only for
eligible projects.
(l) Money in the fund is continuously appropriated for the purpose
of the fund.
(m) Money in the fund may not be transferred, assigned, or
otherwise removed from the fund by the state board of finance, the
budget agency, or any other agency until after budget committee
review, except for either or both of the following purposes:
(1) The department may distribute funds to a local unit that has
been approved for a grant under this chapter without budget
committee review.
(2) To transfer money in the fund under subsections (i) and (j) and
to make a distribution under subsection (k) without budget
committee review.
2026 IN 1382—LS 6892/DI 125